Florida, session 2026, SB1198.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 44 45 Section 1.âSection 408.7057, Florida Statutes, is amended 46 to read: 47 408.7057âMandatory statewide provider and health plan claim 48 dispute resolution program.â 49 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 50 (a)ââAgencyâ means the Agency for Health Care 51 Administration. 52 (b)ââDenied prior authorization requestâ means, with 53 respect to a request submitted by a provider for prior 54 authorization of a health care service, supply, or medication, a 55 health plan has made a determination that the request is wholly 56 or partially disapproved, has not been acted upon within the 57 time limits established by law or contract, or is approved 58 subject to materially restrictive conditions that prevent the 59 service, supply, or medication from being furnished as 60 clinically indicated. 61 (c)ââHealth planâ means a health maintenance organization 62 or a prepaid health clinic certified under chapter 641, a 63 prepaid health plan authorized under s. 409.912, an exclusive 64 provider organization certified under s. 627.6472, or a major 65 medical expense health insurance policy, as defined in s. 66 627.643(2)(e), offered by a group or an individual health 67 insurer licensed pursuant to chapter 624, including a preferred 68 provider organization under s. 627.6471. 69 (d)(c)ââResolution organizationâ means a qualified 70 independent third-party claim-dispute-resolution entity selected 71 by and contracted with the Agency for Health Care 72 Administration. 73 (2)(a)âThe agency shall establish a program to provide 74 assistance to contracted and noncontracted providers and health 75 plans for resolution of claim disputes and denied prior 76 authorization requests that are not resolved by the provider and 77 the health plan. The agency shall contract with a resolution 78 organization to timely review and consider claim disputes and 79 denied prior authorization requests submitted by providers and 80 health plans and recommend to the agency an appropriate 81 resolution of those disputes. The agency shall establish by rule 82 jurisdictional amounts and methods of aggregation for claim 83 disputes and denied prior authorization requests that may be 84 considered by the resolution organization. 85 (b)âParticipation in the claim dispute resolution program 86 is mandatory, and a provider or health plan may not opt out of 87 the programâs claim dispute resolution process. The resolution 88 organization shall review all claim disputes filed by contracted 89 and noncontracted providers and health plans unless the disputed 90 claim: 91 1.âIs related to interest payment; 92 2.âDoes not meet the jurisdictional amounts or the methods 93 of aggregation established by agency rule, as provided in 94 paragraph (a); 95 3.âIs part of an internal grievance in a Medicare managed 96 care organization or a reconsideration appeal through the 97 Medicare appeals process; 98 4.âIs related to a health plan that is not regulated by the 99 state; 100 5.âIs part of a Medicaid fair hearing pursued under 42 101 C.F.R. ss. 431.220 et seq.; 102 6.âIs specifically the subject of an existing lawsuit filed 103 basis for an action pending in state or federal court before the 104 submission of the claim to the resolution organization; or 105 7.âIs subject to a binding claim-dispute-resolution process 106 provided by contract entered into before prior to October 1, 107 2000, between the provider and the managed care organization. 108 (c)âContracts entered into or renewed on or after October 109 1, 2000, may require exhaustion of an internal dispute 110 resolution process as a prerequisite to the submission of a 111 claim by a provider or a health plan to the resolution 112 organization. 113 (d)âA contracted or noncontracted provider or health plan 114 may not file a claim dispute with the resolution organization 115 more than 12 months after a final determination has been made on 116 a claim by a health plan or provider. 117 (e)âThe resolution organization shall require the health 118 plan or provider submitting the claim dispute to submit any 119 supporting documentation to the resolution organization within 120 15 days after receipt by the health plan or provider of a 121 request from the resolution organization for documentation in 122 support of the claim dispute. The resolution organization may 123 extend the time if appropriate. Failure to submit the supporting 124 documentation within such time period shall result in the 125 dismissal of the submitted claim dispute. 126 (f)âThe resolution organization shall require the 127 respondent in the claim dispute to submit all documentation in 128 support of its position within 15 days after receiving a request 129 from the resolution organization for supporting documentation. 130 The resolution organization may extend the time if appropriate. 131 Failure to submit the supporting documentation within such time 132 period shall result in a default against the health plan or 133 provider. A respondent may not avoid a default by declining to 134 participate in the claim dispute resolution process set forth in 135 this section. In the event of such a default, the resolution 136 organization shall issue its written recommendation to the 137 agency that a default be entered against the defaulting entity. 138 The written recommendation shall include a recommendation to the 139 agency that the defaulting entity shall pay the entity 140 submitting the claim dispute the full amount of the claim 141 dispute, plus all accrued interest, and shall be considered a 142 nonprevailing party for the purposes of this section. 143 (g)1.âIf on an ongoing basis during the preceding 12 144 months, the agency has reason to believe that a pattern of 145 noncompliance with s. 627.6131 and s. 641.3155 exists on the 146 part of a particular health plan or provider, the agency shall 147 evaluate the information contained in these cases to determine 148 whether the information evidences a pattern and report its 149 findings, together with substantiating evidence, to the 150 appropriate licensure or certification entity for the health 151 plan or provider. 152 2.âIn addition, the agency shall prepare a report to the 153 Governor and the Legislature by February 1 of each year, 154 enumerating: claims dismissed; defaults issued; and failures to 155 comply with agency final orders issued under this section. 156 (h)âEither the contracted or noncontracted provider or the 157 health plan may make an offer to settle the claim dispute when 158 it submits a request for a claim dispute and supporting 159 documentation. The offer to settle the claim dispute must state 160 its total amount, and the party to whom it is directed has 15 161 days to accept the offer once it is received. If the party 162 receiving the offer does not accept the offer and the final 163 order amount is more than 90 percent or less than 110 percent of 164 the offer amount, the party receiving the offer must pay the 165 final order amount to the offering party and is deemed a 166 nonprevailing party for purposes of this section. The amount of 167 an offer made by a contracted or noncontracted provider to 168 settle an alleged underpayment by the health plan must be 169 greater than 110 percent of the reimbursement amount the 170 provider received. The amount of an offer made by a health plan 171 to settle an alleged overpayment to the provider must be less 172 than 90 percent of the alleged overpayment amount by the health 173 plan. Both parties may agree to settle the disputed claim at any 174 time, for any amount, regardless of whether an offer to settle 175 was made or rejected. 176 (3)âThe agency shall adopt rules to establish a process to 177 be used by the resolution organization in considering claim 178 disputes submitted by a provider or health plan which must 179 include: 180 (a)âThat the resolution organization review and consider 181 all documentation submitted by both the health plan and the 182 provider; 183 (b)âThat the resolution organizationâs recommendation make 184 findings of fact; 185 (c)âThat either party may request that the resolution 186 organization conduct an evidentiary hearing in which both sides 187 can present evidence and examine witnesses, and for which the 188 cost of the hearing is equally shared by the parties; 189 (d)âThat the resolution organization may not communicate ex 190 parte with either the health plan or the provider during the 191 dispute resolution; 192 (e)âThat the resolution organizationâs written 193 recommendation, including findings of fact relating to the 194 calculation under s. 641.513(5) for the recommended amount due 195 for the disputed claim, include any evidence relied upon; and 196 (f)âThat the resolution organization issue a written 197 recommendation to the agency within 60 days after the requested 198 information is received by the resolution organization within 199 the timeframes specified by the resolution organization. In no 200 event shall the review time exceed 90 days following receipt of 201 the initial claim dispute submission by the resolution 202 organization. 203 (4)âWithin 30 days after receipt of the recommendation of 204 the resolution organization, the agency shall adopt the 205 recommendation as a final order. The final order is subject to 206 judicial review pursuant to s. 120.68. 207 (5)âThe agency shall notify within 7 days the appropriate 208 licensure or certification entity whenever there is a violation 209 of a final order issued by the agency pursuant to this section. 210 (6)âThe entity that does not prevail in the agencyâs order 211 must pay a review cost to the review organization, as determined 212 by agency rule. Such rule must provide for an apportionment of 213 the review fee in any case in which both parties prevail in 214 part. If the nonprevailing party fails to pay the ordered review 215 cost within 35 days after the agencyâs order, the nonpaying 216 party is subject to a penalty of not more than $500 per day 217 until the penalty is paid. 218 (7)âIf a claim dispute under this section involves a denied 219 prior authorization request and the health plan is determined to 220 be the nonprevailing party, the health plan must reimburse the 221 provider for the providerâs reasonable costs incurred in 222 bringing the claim, including any filing fees and administrative 223 costs assessed by the agency or its designee. The agency shall 224 adopt rules to specify allowable costs and procedures for 225 recovering such costs under this subsection. 226 (8)âThe agency may adopt rules to administer this section. 227 Section 2.âSubsections (20) and (21) of section 627.6131, 228 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 229 627.6131âPayment of claims.â 230 (20)(a)âA contract between a health insurer and a dentist 231 licensed under chapter 466 or a physician licensed under chapter 232 458 or chapter 459 for the provision of services to an insured 233 may not specify credit card payment as the only acceptable 234 method for payments from the health insurer to the dentist or 235 physician. 236 (b)âWhen a health insurer employs the method of claims 237 payment to a dentist or physician through electronic funds 238 transfer, including, but not limited to, virtual credit card 239 payment, the health insurer shall notify the dentist or 240 physician as provided in this paragraph and obtain the dentistâs 241 or physicianâs consent before employing the electronic funds 242 transfer. The dentistâs or physicianâs consent described in this 243 paragraph applies to the dentistâs or physicianâs entire 244 practice. For the purpose of this paragraph, the dentistâs or 245 physicianâs consent, which may be given through e-mail, must 246 bear the signature of the dentist or physician. Such signature 247 includes an electronic or digital signature if the form of 248 signature is recognized as a valid signature under applicable 249 federal law or state contract law or an act that demonstrates 250 express consent, including, but not limited to, checking a box 251 indicating consent. The health insurer or the dentist or 252 physician may not require that a dentistâs or physicianâs 253 consent as described in this paragraph be made on a patient-by 254 patient basis. The notification provided by the health insurer 255 to the dentist or physician must include all of the following: 256 1.âThe fees, if any, associated with the electronic funds 257 transfer. 258 2.âThe available methods of payment of claims by the health 259 insurer, with clear instructions to the dentist or physician on 260 how to select an alternative payment method. 261 (c)âA health insurer that pays a claim to a dentist or 262 physician through automated clearinghouse transfer may not 263 charge a fee solely to transmit the payment to the dentist or 264 physician unless the dentist or physician has consented to the 265 fee. 266 (d)âThis subsection applies to all contracts: 267 1.âBetween a health insurer and a dentist which are 268 delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025. 269 2.âBetween a health insurer and a physician which are 270 delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027. 271 (e)âThe office has all rights and powers to enforce this 272 subsection as provided by s. 624.307. 273 (f)âThe commission may adopt rules to implement this 274 subsection. 275 (21)(a)âA health insurer may not deny any claim 276 subsequently submitted by a dentist licensed under chapter 466 277 or a physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 for 278 procedures specifically included in a prior authorization unless 279 at least one of the following circumstances applies for each 280 procedure denied: 281 1.âBenefit limitations, such as annual maximums and 282 frequency limitations not applicable at the time of the prior 283 authorization, are reached subsequent to issuance of the prior 284 authorization. 285 2.âThe documentation provided by the person submitting the 286 claim fails to support the claim as originally authorized. 287 3.âSubsequent to the issuance of the prior authorization, 288 new procedures are provided to the patient or a change in the 289 condition of the patient occurs such that the prior authorized 290 procedure would no longer be considered medically necessary, 291 based on the prevailing standard of care. 292 4.âSubsequent to the issuance of the prior authorization, 293 new procedures are provided to the patient or a change in the 294 patientâs condition occurs such that the prior authorized 295 procedure would at that time have required disapproval pursuant 296 to the terms and conditions for coverage under the patientâs 297 plan in effect at the time the prior authorization was issued. 298 5.âThe denial of the claim was due to one of the following: 299 a.âAnother payor is responsible for payment. 300 b.âThe dentist or physician has already been paid for the 301 procedures identified in the claim. 302 c.âThe claim was submitted fraudulently, or the prior 303 authorization was based in whole or material part on erroneous 304 information provided to the health insurer by the dentist or 305 physician, patient, or other person not related to the insurer. 306 d.âThe person receiving the procedure was not eligible to 307 receive the procedure on the date of service. 308 e.âThe services were provided during the grace period 309 established under s. 627.608 or applicable federal regulations, 310 and the dental insurer notified the dentist or physician 311 provider that the patient was in the grace period when the 312 dentist or physician provider requested eligibility or 313 enrollment verification from the dental insurer, if such request 314 was made. 315 (b)âThis subsection applies to all contracts: 316 1.âBetween a health insurer and a dentist which are 317 delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025. 318 2.âBetween a health insurer and a physician which are 319 delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027. 320 (c)âThe office has all rights and powers to enforce this 321 subsection as provided by s. 624.307. 322 (d)âThe commission may adopt rules to implement this 323 subsection. 324 Section 3.âSubsections (13) and (14) of section 641.315, 325 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 326 641.315âProvider contracts.â 327 (13)(a)âA contract between a health maintenance 328 organization and a dentist licensed under chapter 466 or a 329 physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 for the 330 provision of services to a subscriber of the health maintenance 331 organization may not specify credit card payment as the only 332 acceptable method for payments from the health maintenance 333 organization to the dentist or physician. 334 (b)âWhen a health maintenance organization employs the 335 method of claims payment to a dentist or physician through 336 electronic funds transfer, including, but not limited to, 337 virtual credit card payment, the health maintenance organization 338 shall notify the dentist or physician as provided in this 339 paragraph and obtain the dentistâs or physicianâs consent before 340 employing the electronic funds transfer. The dentistâs or 341 physicianâs consent described in this paragraph applies to the 342 dentistâs or physicianâs entire practice. For the purpose of 343 this paragraph, the dentistâs or physicianâs consent, which may 344 be given through e-mail, must bear the signature of the dentist 345 or physician. Such signature includes an electronic or digital 346 signature if the form of signature is recognized as a valid 347 signature under applicable federal law or state contract law or 348 an act that demonstrates express consent, including, but not 349 limited to, checking a box indicating consent. The health 350 maintenance organization or the dentist or physician may not 351 require that a dentistâs or physicianâs consent as described in 352 this paragraph be made on a patient-by-patient basis. The 353 notification provided by the health maintenance organization to 354 the dentist or physician must include all of the following: 355 1.âThe fees, if any, that are associated with the 356 electronic funds transfer. 357 2.âThe available methods of payment of claims by the health 358 maintenance organization, with clear instructions to the dentist 359 or physician on how to select an alternative payment method. 360 (c)âA health maintenance organization that pays a claim to 361 a dentist or physician through automated clearing house transfer 362 may not charge a fee solely to transmit the payment to the 363 dentist or physician unless the dentist or physician has 364 consented to the fee. 365 (d)âThis subsection applies to all contracts: 366 1.âBetween a health maintenance organization and a dentist 367 which are delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 368 2025. 369 2.âBetween a health maintenance organization and a 370 physician which are delivered, issued, or renewed on or after 371 January 1, 2027. 372 (e)âThe office has all rights and powers to enforce this 373 subsection as provided by s. 624.307. 374 (f)âThe commission may adopt rules to implement this 375 subsection. 376 (14)(a)âA health maintenance organization may not deny any 377 claim subsequently submitted by a dentist licensed under chapter 378 466 or a physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 for 379 procedures specifically included in a prior authorization unless 380 at least one of the following circumstances applies for each 381 procedure denied: 382 1.âBenefit limitations, such as annual maximums and 383 frequency limitations not applicable at the time of the prior 384 authorization, are reached subsequent to issuance of the prior 385 authorization. 386 2.âThe documentation provided by the person submitting the 387 claim fails to support the claim as originally authorized. 388 3.âSubsequent to the issuance of the prior authorization, 389 new procedures are provided to the patient or a change in the 390 condition of the patient occurs such that the prior authorized 391 procedure would no longer be considered medically necessary, 392 based on the prevailing standard of care. 393 4.âSubsequent to the issuance of the prior authorization, 394 new procedures are provided to the patient or a change in the 395 patientâs condition occurs such that the prior authorized 396 procedure would at that time have required disapproval pursuant 397 to the terms and conditions for coverage under the patientâs 398 plan in effect at the time the prior authorization was issued. 399 5.âThe denial of the claim was due to one of the following: 400 a.âAnother payor is responsible for payment. 401 b.âThe dentist or physician has already been paid for the 402 procedures identified in the claim. 403 c.âThe claim was submitted fraudulently, or the prior 404 authorization was based in whole or material part on erroneous 405 information provided to the health maintenance organization by 406 the dentist or physician, patient, or other person not related 407 to the organization. 408 d.âThe person receiving the procedure was not eligible to 409 receive the procedure on the date of service. 410 e.âThe services were provided during the grace period 411 established under s. 627.608 or applicable federal regulations, 412 and the dental insurer notified the dentist or physician 413 provider that the patient was in the grace period when the 414 dentist or physician provider requested eligibility or 415 enrollment verification from the dental insurer, if such request 416 was made. 417 (b)âThis subsection applies to all contracts: 418 1.âBetween a health maintenance organization and a dentist 419 which are delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 420 2025. 421 2.âBetween a health maintenance organization and a 422 physician which are delivered, issued, or renewed on or after 423 January 1, 2027. 424 (c)âThe office has all rights and powers to enforce this 425 subsection as provided by s. 624.307. 426 (d)âThe commission may adopt rules to implement this 427 subsection. 428 Section 4.âParagraph (n) of subsection (2) of section 429 409.967, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 430 409.967âManaged care plan accountability.â 431 (2)âThe agency shall establish such contract requirements 432 as are necessary for the operation of the statewide managed care 433 program. In addition to any other provisions the agency may deem 434 necessary, the contract must require: 435 (n)âProvider dispute resolution.âDisputes between a plan 436 and a provider must may be resolved as described in s. 408.7057. 437 Section 5.âSubsection (6) of section 627.64194, Florida 438 Statutes, is amended to read: 439 627.64194âCoverage requirements for services provided by 440 nonparticipating providers; payment collection limitations.â 441 (6)âAny dispute with regard to the reimbursement to the 442 nonparticipating provider of emergency or nonemergency services 443 as provided in subsection (4) shall be resolved in a court of 444 competent jurisdiction or through the mandatory voluntary 445 dispute resolution process in s. 408.7057. 446 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.